North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 12. General Provisions.

§ 127A-145.
Reports of officers.

All officers of the North Carolina National Guard, the State defense militia, and the naval militia shall make returns and reports to the Governor, the Secretary of Defense, or to officers designated by them, at the times and in the form from time to time prescribed.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 21; C.S., s. 6890; 1963, c. 1019, s. 10; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-146.
Officer to give notice of absence.

When any officer shall have occasion to be absent from the officer’s usual residence one week or more, the officer shall notify the officer next in command, and also the officer’s next superior officer in command, of the officer’s intended absence, and shall arrange for the officer next in command to handle and attend to all official communications.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 22; C.S., s. 6891; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, three times substituted “the officer’s” for “his” and substituted “the officer shall notify” for “he shall notify.”

§ 127A-147.
Orders, rules, regulations and Uniform Code of Military Justice applicable to militia when not in service of United States.

The North Carolina National Guard, State defense militia and naval militia, when not in the service of the United States, shall be governed by State law, the orders, rules and regulations of the Adjutant General, regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service of the Armed Forces of the United States, and the Uniform Code of Military Justice, as amended from time to time.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 34; C.S., s. 6892; 1963, c. 1018, s. 7; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 21; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-148.
Commander may prevent trespass and disorder.

The commander upon any occasion of duty may place in arrest during the continuance thereof any person who shall trespass upon the campground, parade ground, armory, or other place devoted to that duty, or who shall in any way or manner interrupt or molest the orderly discharge of duty by those under arms, or shall disturb or prevent the passage of troops going to or returning from any duty. The commander may prohibit and prevent the sale or use of all spirituous liquors, wine, ale, beer, or cider, the holding of huckster or auction sales, and all gambling within the limits of the post, campground or place of encampment, parade or drill under his or her command, or within any limits not exceeding one mile therefrom that the commander may prescribe. The commander may in the commander’s discretion abate as common nuisance all such sales.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 94; C.S., s. 6893; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “that duty” for “such duty” in the first sentence, made minor stylistic changes in the second sentence, and substituted “The commander may in the commander’s discretion” for “And he may in his discretion” in the last sentence.

§ 127A-149.
Power of arrest in certain emergencies.

In the event members of the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia are called out by the Governor pursuant to the authority vested in the Governor by the Constitution, they shall have the power of arrest reasonably necessary to accomplish the purpose for which they have been called out.

History.

1959, c. 453; 1963, c. 1019, s. 11; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the Governor” for “him” and “the power of arrest reasonably necessary” for “such power of arrest as may be reasonably necessary.”

§ 127A-150.
Immunity of guardsmen from civil and criminal liability.

A member of the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia, while acting in aid of civil authorities and in the line of duty, shall have the immunities of a law-enforcement officer.

Members of the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia shall have the immunities of a law-enforcement officer whenever they are called upon to execute the laws; engage in disaster relief; suppress or prevent actual or threatened riot or insurrection; repel invasion; or apprehend or disperse any sniper, rioters, mob or unlawful assembly.

Any civil claim against a member of the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia allegedly arising from the action or inaction of the member of the North Carolina National Guard or State defense militia while in line of duty shall be filed within two years of the date of the occurrence or forever barred.

History.

1969, c. 969; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” throughout this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in subsection (b), deleted “Whenever” from the beginning, inserted “shall have the immunities of a law-enforcement officer whenever they,” substituted “or apprehend or disperse” for “apprehend or disburse,” deleted “they shall have the immunities of a law-enforcement officer” from the end, and made minor stylistic changes; and in subsection (c), twice inserted “North Carolina” and substituted “the member” for “such member.”

§ 127A-151.
Organizing company without authority.

If any person shall organize a military company, or drill or parade under arms as a military body, except under the militia laws and regulations of the State, or shall exercise or attempt to exercise the power or authority of a military officer in this State, without holding a commission from the Governor, the person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1893, c. 374, s. 38; Rev., s. 3538; C.S., s. 6894; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 937; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the person” for “he.”

§ 127A-152.
Placing name on muster roll wrongfully.

If any officer of the militia of the State shall knowingly or willfully place, or cause to be placed, on any muster roll the name of any person not regularly or lawfully enlisted, or the name of any enlisted member who is dead or who has been discharged, transferred, or has lost membership for any cause whatsoever, or who has been convicted of any infamous crime, the officer shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1893, c. 374, s. 33; Rev., s. 3539; C.S., s. 6895; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 938; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “enlisted member” for “enlisted man” and “the officer” for “he.”

§ 127A-153.
Protection of uniform.

The wearing of any military uniform of the United States by members of the militia shall be pursuant to applicable regulations promulgated by the respective branches of the Armed Forces of the United States and regulations of the Adjutant General of North Carolina not inconsistent with federal uniform regulations.

The wearing of any military uniform of the State by members of the militia shall be pursuant to applicable regulations promulgated by the Adjutant General of North Carolina.

Members of the militia who violate the regulations referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall, upon conviction by a court-martial, be punished in like manner and to the extent prescribed by Article 134 of the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be in use by the Armed Forces of the United States at the time of the offense.

Persons not subject to courts-martial who violate the regulations referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be charged and tried in the State courts and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

History.

1921, c. 120, s. 12; C.S., s. 6895(a); 1963, c. 1017; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2010-193, s. 22; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-154.
Upkeep of properties.

There shall be paid from the appropriations for the North Carolina National Guard the amounts necessary for the maintenance, upkeep, and improvement of State military properties and facilities. Provided, these expenditures shall be approved and authorized by the Governor.

History.

1921, c. 120, s. 13; C.S., s. 6895(b); 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the first sentence, substituted “appropriations for the North Carolina National Guard the amounts necessary” for “appropriations from the National Guard such amounts as may be necessary,” and in the last sentence, substituted “these expenditures” for “such expenditures.”

§ 127A-155.
When officers authorized to administer oaths.

Officers of the North Carolina National Guard are authorized to administer oaths in all circumstances pertaining to any military matter whenever an oath is required.

History.

1949, c. 1130, s. 6; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina.”

§§ 127A-156 through 127A-160.

Reserved for future codification purposes.